Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202623-1309
Veterans discharge record; duty to keep; information; confidential; transfer to State Archives, when.

(1) It shall be the duty of the county clerk in each county to keep in a separate book or books, entitled Discharge Record, a copy of all discharges or records of separation from active duty from the armed forces of the United States. Information contained in the Discharge Record shall be confidential and made available only to the veteran, county veterans service officer, or post service officer of a recognized veterans organization.

(2) The county clerk may transfer the Discharge Record to the State Archives of the Nebraska State Historical Society for permanent preservation after the veteran's federal Official Military Personnel File becomes a public archival record or after sixty-two years, whichever is later.

Laws 1921, c. 123, § 1, p. 533;

C.S.1922, § 4935;

C.S.1929, § 26-1012;

R.S.1943, § 23-1309;

Laws 1945, c. 50, § 1, p. 234;

Laws 1953, c. 60, § 1, p. 198;

Laws 1969, c. 166, § 1, p. 742;

Laws 2005, LB 54, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB596, § 3.
July 18, 2026